North Carolina, session 2025, HB492.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REPEAL SESSION LAW 2023-106
SECTION 1. S.L. 2023-106 is repealed.

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 2. Section 7.81 of S.L. 2023-134 is repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 2.8 of S.L. 2024-1 is repealed.
SECTION 4. G.S. 115C-150.16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-150.16. Applicability of Chapter.
Except as otherwise provided in this Article and Article 7B of this Chapter, Article, the
requirements of this Chapter shall not apply to the schools for the deaf and blind. Schools for the
deaf and blind shall be considered a State agency, as defined in G.S. 143C-1-1, and shall comply
with all requirements for State agencies unless otherwise specified in this Article. Schools for the
deaf and blind shall not be considered local school administrative units."
SECTION 5. G.S. 115C-218.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.10. Charter school exemptions.
Except as provided in this Article and Article 7B of this Chapter, Article, and pursuant to the
provisions of its charter, a charter school is exempt from statutes and rules applicable to a local
board of education or local school administrative unit."
SECTION 6. G.S. 115C-238.60(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Except as otherwise provided in this Part and Article 7B of this Chapter, Part, a
regional school is exempt from statutes and rules applicable to a local board of education or local
school administrative unit."
SECTION 7. G.S. 116-239.5(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Except as otherwise provided in this Article and Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the
General Statutes, Article, the Subcommittee, the chancellor of each constituent institution that
operates a laboratory school, and the laboratory school are exempt from statutes and rules
applicable to a local board of education or local school administrative unit."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H492-v-1*